Hawaii statutes.
§198-1 Conservation easement defined.
For the purposes of this chapter, a "conservation easement" is an
interest in real property created by deed, restrictions, covenants, or
conditions, the purpose of which is to:

(1) Preserve and protect land predominantly in its
natural, scenic, forested, or open-space condition;

(2) Preserve and protect the structural integrity and
physical appearance of cultural landscapes, resources, and sites which
perpetuate indigenous native Hawaiian culture;

(3) Preserve and protect historic properties as
defined in section 6E-2, and traditional and family cemeteries; or

(4) Preserve and protect land for agricultural use. [L
1985, c 149, pt of §1; am L 1996, c 194, §1; am L 2007, c 145, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next